Hawaii statutes.
§88-110 Board; trustees of funds. The
board of trustees shall be trustees of the several funds of the system and may
invest and reinvest such funds as authorized by this part and by law from time
to time provided. Subject to the terms, conditions, limitations and
restrictions of this part and by law from time to time provided, the trustees
may hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer or dispose of any of the securities
and investments in which any of the funds created herein shall have been
invested, as well as of the proceeds of the investments and any moneys
belonging to the funds. [L 1925, c 55, pt of §7; RL 1935, pt of §7926; am L
1939, c 5, pt of §1; RL 1945, §710, subs 1; RL 1955, §6-74; HRS §88-100; am L
1969, c 110, pt of §1]

Attorney General Opinions

Trustees may not waive penalty for prepayment of loan. Att.
Gen. Op. 62-22.

Case Notes

Mentioned: 74 H. 181, 840 P.2d 367.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next